Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 5. Seafood Development Tax.

Sec. 43.76.350.
Two percent seafood development tax.

A person holding a limited entry permit or interim-use permit under AS 16.43 shall pay a seafood development tax at the rate of two percent of the value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of fishery resources taken in a fishery that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A two percent seafood development tax on fishery resources taken in a fishery may only be levied and collected under (a) of this section if

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development has designated an organization to be the qualified regional seafood development association for the seafood development region in which the fishery occurs; and

the two percent seafood development tax for the fishery is approved under AS

43.76.370

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b)(1) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.355.
One and one-half percent seafood development tax.

A person holding a limited entry permit or interim-use permit under AS 16.43 shall pay a seafood development tax at the rate of 1.5 percent of the value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of fishery resources taken in a fishery that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A 1.5 percent seafood development tax on fishery resources taken in a fishery may only be levied and collected under (a) of this section if

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development has designated an organization to be the qualified regional seafood development association for the seafood development region in which the fishery occurs; and

the 1.5 percent seafood development tax for the fishery is approved under AS

43.76.370

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b)(1) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.360.
One percent seafood development tax.

A person holding a limited entry permit or interim-use permit under AS 16.43 shall pay a seafood development tax at the rate of one percent of the value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of fishery resources taken in a fishery that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A one percent seafood development tax on fishery resources taken in a fishery may only be levied and collected under (a) of this section if

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development has designated an organization to be the qualified regional seafood development association for the seafood development region in which the fishery occurs; and

the one percent seafood development tax for the fishery is approved under AS

43.76.370

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b)(1) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.365.
One-half percent seafood development tax.

A person holding a limited entry permit or interim-use permit under AS 16.43 shall pay a seafood development tax at the rate of 0.5 percent of the value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of fishery resources taken in a fishery that the person removes from the state or transfers to a buyer in the state.

A 0.5 percent seafood development tax on fishery resources taken in a fishery may only be levied or collected under (a) of this section if

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development has designated an organization to be the qualified regional seafood development association for the seafood development region in which the fishery occurs; and

the 0.5 percent seafood development tax for the fishery is approved under AS

43.76.370

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b)(1) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.370.
Election to approve, amend, or terminate seafood development tax.

A qualified regional seafood development association for a seafood development region may conduct an election under this section to approve, amend, or terminate a seafood development tax in one or more fisheries in a seafood development region after

the association pays a fee of $500 for each fishery in which an election is held; and

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development approves

the notice to be published by the qualified regional seafood development association;

the ballot to be used in the election; and

the registration and voting procedure for the approval, amendment, or termination of the seafood development tax.

The seafood development tax is levied under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

on fishery resources taken in a fishery, or is amended or terminated, on the effective date stated on the ballot if

the levy, amendment, or termination of the tax is approved by a majority vote of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery who vote in an election held under this section;

at least 30 percent of the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery cast a ballot in the election to levy, amend, or terminate the tax; and

the election results are certified by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development under (d) of this section.

In conducting an election under this section, the qualified regional seafood development association shall adopt the following procedures:

the association shall hold at least one public meeting, not less than 30 days before the date on which ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election, to explain the reason for the proposed seafood development tax, the amendment of the tax, or the termination of the tax and to explain the registration and voting procedure to be used in the election; the association shall provide notice of the meeting by

mailing the notice to each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder;

posting the notice in at least three public places in the seafood development region in which the fishery occurs; and

publishing the notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the region at least once a week for two consecutive weeks before the meeting;

the association shall mail two ballots to each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder; the first ballot shall be mailed not more than 45 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election; the second ballot shall be mailed not less than 15 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in the election; the association shall adopt procedures to ensure that only one ballot from each eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder is counted in the election;

the ballot must

indicate whether the election relates to a seafood development tax under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

;

indicate the fishery that is or will be subject to the seafood development tax to be levied or amended;

ask the question whether the seafood development tax shall be levied or amended, as appropriate;

indicate the geographic boundaries of the seafood development region in which the seafood development tax will be levied;

provide an effective date for the levy or amendment of the seafood development tax in the fishery; and

indicate the date on which returned ballots must be postmarked in order to be counted;

the ballots shall be returned by mail and shall be counted by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or by a person approved by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall certify the results of an election under this section if the commissioner determines that the requirements of (a) — (c) of this section have been satisfied.

The rate of the seafood development tax levied in a seafood development region shall be uniform for all fisheries and fishery resources in the region.

If a seafood development tax has not been levied on a fishery resource in a seafood development region, the initial tax levied in any fishery in the region may be set at a rate set under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

in accordance with procedures set out in this section. If a seafood development tax is currently levied on fishery resources in any fishery in a seafood development region, an election to approve the initial levy of a seafood development tax in another fishery in the region shall be for a levy of the tax at the current rate in the region. The election to approve the levy of a seafood development tax within a fishery shall be conducted among the eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the fishery.

An election to amend the current rate of the seafood development tax within a seafood development region shall be conducted among the eligible interim-use permit holders and entry permit holders in each fishery within the region that has approved the levy of the tax under this section. In an election to amend the current rate of the seafood development tax within a region, a person shall receive, and may cast and have counted, a separate ballot for each fishery in the seafood development region that is subject to the tax for which the person is an eligible interim-use permit or entry permit holder.

Except as provided in AS

43.76.375

, an election to terminate a seafood development tax within one or more fisheries in a seafood development region shall be conducted under the same procedures established under (a) — (d) of this section for an election to approve or amend a seafood development tax.

In this section, “eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holder” means an individual who, 90 days before the date ballots must be postmarked to be counted in an election under this section, is listed in the records of the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission as the legal owner of an interim-use permit or an entry permit that authorizes the individual to operate commercial fishing gear in the fishery that is or will be subject to the seafood development tax that is the subject of the election.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (a) - (d) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.375.
Termination of seafood development tax.

The seafood development tax levied under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

may be terminated by the commissioner of revenue upon majority vote of eligible permit holders who vote in an election held under AS

43.76.370

in which at least 30 percent of the eligible permit holders cast a ballot. The seafood development tax may be terminated in one or more fisheries within a seafood development region under this section.

The commissioner of revenue shall terminate a seafood development tax under (a) of this section following an election conducted by the qualified seafood development association for the seafood development region if

a petition is presented to the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development requesting termination of the seafood development tax in a fishery that is signed by at least 10 percent of the number of persons who are eligible to vote in an election under AS

43.76.370

to approve the levy of the seafood development tax in the fishery;

an election is held in accordance with AS

43.76.370

; the ballot must ask the question whether the seafood development tax for the fishery shall be terminated; the ballot must be worded so that a “yes” vote is for continuation of the seafood development tax and a “no” vote is for termination of the seafood development tax;

a majority of the votes cast in the election by eligible interim-use permit and entry permit holders are for the termination of the seafood development tax;

at least 30 percent of the permit holders who are eligible to vote in the election cast a ballot in the election; and

the qualified regional seafood development association for the fishery provides notice of the election in accordance with AS 43.76.370 within two months after receiving notice from the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development that a valid petition under (1) of this subsection has been received.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.380.
Liability for tax on fishery resources sold to a buyer.

Except as provided under (c) of this section, a buyer who acquires a fishery resource that is subject to a seafood development tax levied under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

shall collect the seafood development tax at the time of purchase, and shall remit the total tax collected during each month to the department by the last day of the next month.

A buyer who collects the seafood development tax shall

maintain records reflecting the fishery in which the fishery resource was caught; and

report to the Department of Revenue by March 1 of each year the total value, as defined in AS

43.75.290

, of the fishery resources caught in each fishery that the buyer has acquired during the preceding year.

A commercial fisherman who transfers possession of a fishery resource to a buyer who is not a fisheries business licensed under AS 43.75 is liable for the payment of a seafood development tax levied under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

if, at the time possession of the fishery resource is transferred to a buyer, the seafood development tax payable on the fishery resource has not been collected. If a commercial fisherman is liable for payment of the seafood development tax under this subsection, the commercial fisherman shall comply with the requirements under (b) of this section to maintain records and to make reports to the Department of Revenue. Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person subject to this subsection shall remit the total seafood development tax payable during the calendar year to the Department of Revenue before April 1 after close of the calendar year.

The Department of Revenue shall deposit the seafood development tax collected under AS

43.76.350

—

43.76.399

in the general fund. The legislature may make appropriations based on this revenue to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for the purpose of providing financing for qualified regional seafood development associations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (d) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 43.76.385.
Liability for tax on fishery resources shipped from the state.

The owner of fishery resources removed from the state is liable for payment of a seafood development tax levied under AS

43.76.350

,

43.76.355

,

43.76.360

, or

43.76.365

if, at the time the fishery resources are removed from the state, the seafood development tax payable on the fishery resources has not been collected by a buyer.

If the owner of fishery resources is liable for payment of the seafood development tax under (a) of this section, the owner shall comply with the requirement of AS

43.76.380(b)

to report the owner’s liability for payment of the tax.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.76.390.
Exemption.

AS

43.76.350

—

43.76.399

do not apply to salmon harvested under a special harvest area entry permit issued under AS

16.43.400

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.76.399.
Definitions.

In AS

43.76.350

—

43.76.399

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“buyer” means a person who acquires possession of fishery resources from the person who caught the fishery resources regardless of whether there is an actual sale of the fishery resources but excluding a transfer to a person engaged solely in interstate transportation of goods for hire;

“fishery” has the meaning given in AS

16.43.990

;

“qualified regional seafood development association” means an association designated as qualified under AS

44.33.065(a)

;

“seafood development region” means a region established under AS

44.33.065(b)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 2004; am § 38 ch 12 SLA 2006)